Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB341.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "employer" in section 2.1 of the act of July 14, 1961 (P.L.637, No.329), known as the Wage Payment and Collection Law, is amended and the section is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 2.1. Definitions.--The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *1234567891011121314151617181920212223 "Employer." Includes: [every person, firm, partnership, association, corporation, receiver or other officer of a court of this Commonwealth and any agent or officer of any of the above-mentioned classes employing any person in this Commonwealth.](1) The Commonwealth. (2) A political subdivision of the Commonwealth. (3) An authority created by the General Assembly. (4) An instrumentality or agency of the Commonwealth. (5) Every person, firm, partnership, association, corporation, receiver or other officer of a court of this Commonwealth.(6) An agent or officer of any of the persons or entities described in paragraphs (1), (2), (3), (4) and (5) employing any person in this Commonwealth.* * *"High violation industry." An industry that incurs at least 25 violations over a two-year period.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 8.1. Duty of Department to Report.--(a) The department shall collect on a quarterly basis the following data categorized by industry:(1) number of violations; (2) amount of fines collected; (3) nature of violations; (4) number of individual complaints filed; (5) number of complaints resolved; (6) amount of unpaid wages owed; (7) amount of unpaid wages recovered; 20250SB0341PN0278 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (8) number of pending individual complaints; (9) number of workplaces investigated from complaints; (10) number of workplaces investigated proactively; (11) number of workplaces reinvestigated following violations; and(12) number of subsequent violations. (b) On a semiannual basis, the department shall prepare and submit a report of the data collected under subsection (a) to the chairperson of the Labor and Industry Committee of the Senate and the chairperson of the Labor and Industry Committee of the House of Representatives, and shall post the report on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(c) The secretary shall investigate high-violation industries no less than quarterly, train investigators to recognize basic labor, health and safety violations and engage in cross-agency referrals to protect workers' rights.Section 3. Section 9.1(c) of the act is amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 9.1. Civil Remedies and Penalties.--* * *(c) The employe or group of employes, labor organization or party to whom any type of wages is payable may, in the alternative, inform the secretary of the wage claim against an employer or former employer, and the secretary shall, unless the claim appears to be frivolous, immediately notify the employer or former employer of such claim by certified mail. If the employer or former employer fails to pay the claim or make satisfactory explanation to the secretary of his failure to do so within ten days after receipt of such certified notification, thereafter, the employer or former employer shall be liable for a penalty of [ten percent (10%) of that portion of the claim 20250SB0341PN0278 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 found to be justly due.] two thousand dollars ($2,000) per violation of this act or the regulations of this act or equal to triple the unpaid wages in damages to the employe, whichever is greater, and attorney fees. Each week in which an employe is paid less than the applicable wage under this act and each employe who is paid less than the prescribed rate shall constitute a separate violation that shall be subject to a separate penalty. A good faith dispute or contest as to the amount of wages due or the good faith assertion of a right of set-off or counter-claim shall be deemed a satisfactory explanation for nonpayment of such amount in dispute or claimed as a set-off or counter-claim. The secretary [shall have a cause of action against the employer or former employer for recovery of such penalty and the same] may issue an order and levy the civil penalty only after affording the accused party the opportunity for a hearing as provided under 2 Pa.C.S. (relating to administrative law and procedure). The penalty may be included in any subsequent action by the secretary on said wage claim or may be exercised separately after adjustment of such wage claim without court action. At the request of an employe, the department shall assign that portion of the money due that constitutes wages, wage supplements, interest on wages, or wage supplements, and liquidated damages due the employe, to the employe and shall file an order in that amount in the name of the employe with the county clerk of the county where the employer resides or has a place of business. The filing of the order shall have the full force and effect of a judgment duly docketed in the office of the clerk.* * *(h) It is unlawful for an employer or the employer's agent, 20250SB0341PN0278 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or the officer or agent of a corporation, to discharge or in any other manner discriminate against an employe who:(1) files or submits a complaint under this act; (2) cooperates with the secretary or the secretary's representative, submits evidence, testifies or is about to testify before the secretary or the secretary's representative in any investigation or proceeding under or related to this act;(3) the employer believes may take the actions under this subsection or subsection (i);(4) exercises any right under this act or any regulation implementing its provisions; or(5) provides assistance or information to another employe about this act.(i) A first offense under subsection (h) shall be graded as a summary offense. A second or subsequent offense under subsection (h), committed within a five-year period of the prior offense, shall be graded as a misdemeanor of the third degree and shall be punishable by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than three thousand dollars ($3,000) or to imprisonment of not less than 10 days nor more than 100 days. Each day of the failure to comply with subsection (h) or the regulations of subsection (h) and each employe who is discharged or in any other manner discriminated against shall constitute a separate offense subject to a separate penalty. An employer and the employer's agent, or the officer or agent of any corporation, may also be required to pay the employe an amount set by the court sufficient to compensate the employe and deter future violations.Section 4. Sections 10 and 11.1 of the act are amended to read:20250SB0341PN0278 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 10. Liquidated Damages.--Where wages remain unpaid for thirty days beyond the regularly scheduled payday, or, in the case where no regularly scheduled payday is applicable, for sixty days beyond the filing by the employe of a proper claim or for sixty days beyond the date of the agreement, award or other act making wages payable, or where shortages in the wage payments made exceed five percent (5%) of the gross wages payable on any two regularly scheduled paydays in the same calendar quarter, and no good faith contest or dispute of any wage claim including the good faith assertion of a right of set-off or counter-claim exists accounting for such non-payment, the employe shall be entitled to claim, in addition, as liquidated damages an amount equal to [twenty-five percent (25%) of the total amount of wages due, or five hundred dollars ($500), whichever is greater.] triple the unpaid wages due or two thousand dollars ($2,000), whichever is greater, and attorney fees. Each week in which an employe is paid less than the applicable wage under this act shall constitute a separate violation that shall be subject to a separate penalty.Section 11.1. Criminal Penalties.--(a) The secretary or any employe, group of employes, labor organization or party to whom any type of wages is payable may institute prosecutions under this act.(b) In addition to any other penalty or punishment otherwise prescribed by law, any employer who violates any provisions of this act [shall be guilty of a summary offense and, upon conviction thereof,] shall be punished by a fine of not [more] less than three hundred dollars ($300) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment up to 90 days, or by both[, for each offense]. Each day of the failure to comply 20250SB0341PN0278 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 with this act, and each employe against whom the employer or officer or agent of any corporation violated any other provision of this act, shall constitute a separate offense that shall be subject to a separate penalty. A first offense under this subsection shall be graded as a summary offense. A second or subsequent offense under this subsection, committed within a five-year period of the prior offense, shall be graded as a misdemeanor of the third degree and shall be punishable by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000). The good faith contest or dispute by any employer of any wage claim or the good faith assertion of a right of set-off or counter-claim shall not be considered a violation of this act: Provided, That the employer has paid all wages due in excess of the amount in dispute or asserted to be subject to a right of set-off or counter-claim. [Nonpayment of wages to, on account of, or for the benefit of each individual employe shall constitute a separate offense.](c) Where such employer is a corporation, the president, secretary, treasurer or officers exercising corresponding functions shall each be guilty of such summary offense.(d) All fines or penalties collected under [this act shall be paid into the State Treasury through the Department of Revenue to the credit of the General Fund.] section 9.1 and this section shall be deposited into the Wage Enforcement Fund established under section 11.3. Section 5. The act is amended by adding sections to read:Section 11.2. Employer Liability.--An employer similar in operation and ownership to another employer found in violation of section 9.1(c) or (h) or 11.1(b) shall be deemed the same employer for the purposes of this section if the employes of the 20250SB0341PN0278 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 similar employer are engaged in substantially the same work in substantially the same working conditions under substantially the same supervisors, or if the similar employer has substantially the same production process, produces substantially the same products and has the same body of customers as the other employer found in violation of section 9.1(c) or (h) or 11.1(b). The similar employer shall continue to be subject to section 9.1(c), (h) and (i) or 11.1(b) and shall be liable for the acts of the other employer under section 9.1(c), (h) and (i) or 11.1(b), as applicable.Section 11.3. Wage Enforcement Fund.--(a) The Wage Enforcement Fund is established in the State Treasury. The money in the Wage Enforcement Fund shall consist of the fines and penalties collected under sections 9.1 and 11.1.(b) Money in the Wage Enforcement Fund is appropriated, upon approval of the Governor, to the department for periodic inspections, for investigations of violations and for the enforcement of this act and the act of January 17, 1968 (P.L.11, No.5), known as The Minimum Wage Act of 1968, including, but not limited to, staffing for inspection, investigation and enforcement under this act and The Minimum Wage Act of 1968. (c) No money may be expended or obligated from the Wage Enforcement Fund to any third party for any other purpose than investigation, training investigators and enforcement under this act and The Minimum Wage Act of 1968.(d) Money in the Wage Enforcement Fund shall not lapse at any time or be transferred to any other fund.(e) No later than June 30 of each calendar year, the department shall provide a report to the Governor and the General Assembly, through the Secretary-Parliamentarian of the 20250SB0341PN0278 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Senate and the Chief Clerk of the House of Representatives, regarding the Wage Enforcement Fund. The report shall include:(1) an accounting for the fines collected and deposited into the Wage Enforcement Fund;(2) the expenditures and transfers from the Wage Enforcement Fund during the prior year; (3) a description of the purposes for which expenditures from the Wage Enforcement Fund were made in the prior year; and (4) a full account of the data collections required of the department under section 7 of The Minimum Wage Act of 1968. (f) The department shall post the report required under subsection (e) on the department's publicly accessible Internet website no later than July 1 of each calendar year. Section 6. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0341PN0278 - 9 - 1234567891011121314